Washington statutes.
RCW 13.22.030

Model policy.

(1) The department shall, by July 1, 2021, adopt a model policy prohibiting the use of solitary confinement of juveniles in detention facilities and institutions, with the goal of also limiting the use and duration of isolation and room confinement. In determining the model policy, the department must consult with appropriate stakeholders including, but not limited to, juvenile court administrators, impacted youth, and representatives of staff. At a minimum, the model policy must include:

(a) Isolation. Isolation may only be used as a last resort when less restrictive methods have not been effective. Where needed, medical professionals must assess or evaluate any juvenile in isolation as soon as possible after the juvenile is placed in isolation, and qualified mental health professionals must evaluate and develop a care plan for juveniles placed in isolation to prevent self-harm as soon as possible after the juvenile is placed in isolation. The model policy must include measures to prevent the use of isolation, while protecting the safety and security of incarcerated juveniles and their peers, the staff of the detention facilities and institutions, other persons who work in the detention facilities and institutions, and visitors.

(b) Room confinement. Room confinement is the preferred option for maladaptive or negative behavior. Staff will use the least amount of time to meet the purpose of the intervention. The model policy must include measures to prevent the use of room confinement, while protecting the safety and security of incarcerated juveniles and their peers, the staff of the detention facilities and institutions, other persons who work in the detention facilities and institutions, and visitors.

(2) By December 1, 2021, the detention facility or institution shall review and either (a) adopt the model policy established in this section or (b) notify the department of the reasons the detention facility or institution will not adopt the model policy, including how the detention facility or institution's policies and procedures differ from the model policy.

[ 2020 c 333 s 4.]